Nebraska, session 109, LB205.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB205 LB205
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 4 of this act:
(1) Claimant means a person seeking damages for medical expenses in
a personal injury or wrongful death action;
(2) Factoring company means a person who purchases a health care
provider's accounts receivable at a discount below the invoice value of
such accounts;
(3) Health care coverage means any third-party health care or
disability services financing arrangement, including, but not limited to,
arrangements with entities certified or authorized under state or federal
law; state or federal health care benefit programs; workers'
compensation; and personal injury protection;
(4) Health care provider means any of the following professionals
and entities, and professionals and entities similarly licensed in
another jurisdiction:
(a) A facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act
and its clinical and nonclinical staff providing inpatient or outpatient
services;
(b) A health care professional licensed under the Uniform
Credentialing Act;
(c) A professional health care service entity as defined in section
71-7910.01;
(d) An organization or association of health care professionals
licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act;
(e) A clinical laboratory providing services in this state or
services to health care providers in this state, if the clinical
laboratory is certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
of the United States Department of Health and Human Services under the
federal Clinical Laboratories Improvement Act of 1967, as amended, and
any rules issued thereunder, as such act and rules existed on January 1,
2025;
(f) A federally qualified health center as defined in 42 U.S.C.
-2-

LB205 LB205
2025 2025
1396d(l)(2)(B), as such section existed on January 1, 2025; and
(g) A home health aide as defined in section 71-6602; and
(5) Letter of protection means any arrangement by which a health
care provider renders treatment in exchange for a promise of payment for
the claimant's medical expenses from any judgment or settlement of a
personal injury or wrongful death action. The term includes any such
arrangement, regardless of whether referred to as a letter of protection.
Sec. 2. (1) Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages for
past or future medical treatment or services in a personal injury or
wrongful death action shall only be admissible as provided in this
section.
(2) Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages for charges for
past medical treatment or services that have been satisfied is limited to
evidence of the amount actually paid, regardless of the source of
payment.
(3) Evidence offered to prove the amount necessary to satisfy unpaid
charges incurred for medical treatment or services is limited to the
following:
(a) If the claimant has health care coverage other than medicare or
medicaid, evidence of the amount which such health care coverage is
obligated to pay the health care provider to satisfy such charges, plus
the claimant's share of such charges;
(b) If the claimant has health care coverage but obtains treatment
under a letter of protection or otherwise does not submit charges for any
health care provider's medical treatment or services to health care
coverage, evidence of the amount the claimant's health care coverage
would pay the health care provider to satisfy such past unpaid charges,
plus the claimant's share of such charges, had the claimant obtained
medical services or treatment pursuant to the health care coverage;
(c) If the claimant does not have health care coverage or has health
care coverage through medicare or medicaid, evidence of one hundred
-3-

LB205 LB205
2025 2025
twenty percent of the medicare reimbursement rate in effect on the date
of the claimant's incurred medical treatment or services or, if there is
no applicable medicare rate for a medical treatment or service, one
hundred seventy percent of the applicable state medicaid rate in effect
on such date;
(d) If the claimant obtains medical treatment or services under a
letter of protection and the health care provider subsequently transfers
the right to receive payment under the letter of protection to a third
party, evidence of the amount the third party paid or agreed to pay the
health care provider in exchange for the right to receive payment
pursuant to the letter of protection; and
(e) Any evidence of reasonable amounts billed to the claimant for
medically necessary treatment or medically necessary services provided to
the claimant.
(4) Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages for any unpaid
charges for future medical treatment or services the claimant will
receive is limited to the following:
(a) If the claimant has health care coverage, other than medicare or
medicaid, or is eligible for any such health care coverage, evidence of
the amount for which such future charges of health care providers could
be satisfied if submitted to such health care coverage, plus the
claimant's share of such charges;
(b) If the claimant does not have health care coverage, has health
care coverage through medicare or medicaid, or is eligible for such
coverage through medicare or medicaid, evidence of one hundred twenty
percent of the medicare reimbursement rate in effect at the time of trial
for the medical treatment or services the claimant will receive or, if
there is no applicable medicare rate for a medical treatment or service,
one hundred seventy percent of the applicable state medicaid rate in
effect at such time; and
(c) Any evidence of reasonable future amounts to be billed to the
-4-

LB205 LB205
2025 2025
claimant for medically necessary treatment or medically necessary
services.
(5) This section does not impose an affirmative duty upon any party
to seek a reduction in billed charges to which the party is not
contractually entitled.
(6) Individual contracts between health care providers and
authorized commercial insurers or authorized health maintenance
organizations are not subject to discovery or disclosure and are not
admissible into evidence to prove the amount of damages for past or
future medical treatment or services in a personal injury or wrongful
death action.
Sec. 3. In a personal injury or wrongful death action, as a
condition precedent to asserting any claim for expenses for medical
treatment or services rendered under a letter of protection, the claimant
shall disclose:
(1) A copy of the letter of protection;
(2) All billings for such medical expenses, which must be itemized
and, to the extent applicable, coded according to:
(a) For health care providers billing at the provider level, the
American Medical Association's Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), or
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' Healthcare Common
Procedure Coding System (HCPCS), in effect on the date the medical
treatment or services were rendered;
(b) For health care providers billing at the facility level for
expenses incurred in a clinical or outpatient setting, including when
billing through an Ambulatory Payment Classification (APC) or Enhanced
Ambulatory Patient Grouping (EAPG), the International Classification of
Diseases (ICD) diagnosis code and, if applicable, the American Medical
Association's Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), in effect on the date
the medical treatment or services were rendered; and
(c) For health care providers billing at the facility level for
-5-

LB205 LB205
2025 2025
expenses incurred in an inpatient setting, including when billing through
a Diagnosis Related Group (DRG), the International Classification of
Diseases (ICD) diagnosis and procedure codes in effect on the date on
which the claimant is discharged;
(3) If the health care provider sells the accounts receivable for
the claimant's medical expenses to a factoring company or other third
party:
(a) The name of the factoring company or other third party who
purchased such accounts; and
(b) The dollar amount for which the factoring company or other third
party purchased such accounts, including any discount provided below the
invoice amount;
(4) Whether the claimant, at the time medical treatment or services
were rendered, had health care coverage and, if so, the identity of such
coverage; and
(5) Whether the claimant was referred for medical treatment or
services under a letter of protection and, if so, the identity of the
person who made the referral. If the referral is made by the claimant's
attorney, disclosure of the referral is permitted, and evidence of such
referral is admissible notwithstanding any attorney-client privilege
asserted. In such situation, the financial relationship between a law
firm and a health care provider, including the number of referrals,
frequency, and financial benefit obtained, is relevant to the issue of
the bias of a testifying health care provider.
Sec. 4. The damages that may be recovered by a claimant in a
personal injury or wrongful death action for the reasonable and necessary
cost or value of past or future medical treatment or services shall not:
(1) Include any amount in excess of the evidence of charges for
medical treatment or services admitted pursuant to section 2 of this act;
or
(2) Exceed the sum of the following:
-6-

LB205 LB205
2025 2025
(a) Amounts actually paid by or on behalf of the claimant to a
health care provider who rendered medical treatment or services;
(b) Amounts necessary to satisfy charges for medical treatment or
services that are due and owing but at the time of trial are not yet
satisfied; and
(c) Amounts necessary to provide for any reasonable and necessary
medical treatment or services the claimant will receive in the future.
Sec. 5. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Commercial motor vehicle has the same meaning as in section
60-316; and
(b) Commercial motor vehicle carrier means any person that
transports property by commercial motor vehicle upon the public highways.
(2) The total amount recoverable per plaintiff for noneconomic
damages in a civil action for personal injury or death involving a
commercial motor vehicle requiring a commercial driver's license, whether
in tort or otherwise, is one million dollars. This limit on damages
applies regardless of the number of derivative claims or theories of
liability in the civil action.
(3) In a civil action subject to the limit provided in subsection
(2) of this section:
(a) If the action is tried before a jury, the jury shall first make
a finding as to noneconomic damages without regard to the limit in
subsection (2) of this section. If the noneconomic damages exceed such
limit, the court shall then reduce the award to comply with such limit;
and
(b) If the action is tried without a jury, the court shall first
make a finding as to noneconomic damages without regard to the limit in
subsection (2) of this section. If the noneconomic damages exceed such
limit, the court shall then reduce the award to comply with such limit.
-7-